Utah statutes.
53A-11-302.5.   Personal belief immunization exemption.
(1)  The Department of Health shall provide to all local health departments a
form to be used by persons claiming an exemption from immunization
requirements based on a personal belief opposed to immunization.  The form
shall include a statement printed on the form and drafted by the Department of
Health stating the department's position regarding the benefits of
immunization.  The form shall require, at a minimum:
(a)  a statement claiming exemption from immunizations required under Section
53A-11-302, signed by a person listed under Subsection 53A-11-302(3)(c);
(b)  the name and address of the person who signs the form;
(c)  the name of the student exempted from immunizations; and
(d)  the school at which the student is enrolling.
(2) (a)  The Department of Health shall provide these forms to the local
health departments.
(b)  Local health departments shall make the forms available to the public
upon request.
(3)  (a)  A student enrolling in a school and who claims exemption from
immunizations based on a personal belief shall complete the form described in
Subsection (1) and provide it to the school officials at the school in which
the student is enrolling.
(b)  Students who prior to July 1, 1992, claimed an exemption from
immunizations based on personal beliefs shall prior to December 1, 1992,
complete the form described in Subsection (1) and provide it to the
appropriate official of the school the student attends.
